Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1608
Discontinuance of service; dispute; conference.

A domestic subscriber may request a conference in regard to any dispute over a proposed discontinuance of service before an employee designated by the utility to hear such matters. The employee designated by the utility shall hear and decide all matters disputed by domestic subscribers. The subjects to be heard shall include matters relating to a disputed bill.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2706;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 8.